California, session 20252026, AB2429.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 8243 of the Education Code is amended to read:8243. (a) (1) For purposes of this section, “early childhood mental health consultation service” means a service benefiting a child who is served in a California state preschool program.(2) For purposes of this section, “early childhood mental health consultation service” includes, but is not limited to, all of the following:(A) Support for providers, parents, legal guardians, and caregivers to create trauma-informed, proactive inclusive environments and to respond effectively to all children.(B) Assistance through individual site consultations, provision of resources, formulation of training plans, referrals, and other methods that address the unique needs of programs and providers.(C) Aid to providers, parents, legal guardians, and caregivers, and encouragement and facilitation of collaboration and communication, in developing the skills and tools needed to be successful as they support the development and early learning of all children, including observing environments, facilitating the development of action plans, and supporting site implementation of those plans.(D) The development of strategies for addressing prevalent child mental health concerns, including internalizing problems, such as appearing withdrawn, and externalizing problems, such as exhibiting persistent and serious behaviors.(E) If a child exhibits persistent and serious behaviors, support with the pursuit and documentation of reasonable steps to maintain the child’s safe participation in the program, as described in Section 8489.1.(F) Face-to-face interactions or video-based platforms and other modes of communication that are compliant with the federal Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act (Public Law 104-191), such as the telephone.(G) Group or individual consultations of any of the actions described in this paragraph.(b) The cost to an agency of providing an early childhood mental health consultation service shall be reimbursable pursuant to Section 8244 if all of the following apply:(1) The early childhood mental health consultation service is provided on a schedule of sufficient and consistent frequency continuously throughout the program year, to significantly contribute to all of the following:(A) Improving interpersonal relationships and child outcomes.(B) Increasing the confidence, competence, and well-being of those consulted.(C) Eliminating suspensions and expulsions.(2) (A) The early childhood mental health consultation service is provided by one of the following persons:(i) A licensed mental health professional, including a marriage and family therapist, a licensed clinical social worker, a licensed professional clinical counselor, a licensed psychologist, a licensed child and adolescent psychiatrist, a credentialed school counselor, or a school psychologist credentialed pursuant to Section 44266 and employed pursuant to Section 49400. The person described in this subparagraph shall have at least three years of experience providing mental health services to children zero to five years of age, inclusive, shall have training in infant, family, and early childhood mental health, shall be adequately insured, shall have held their respective license for a minimum of two years, and shall be in full compliance with all continuing education requirements applicable to their profession.(ii) A license-eligible marriage and family therapist, a license-eligible clinical social worker, a license-eligible professional clinical counselor, a license-eligible psychologist, or a license-eligible child and adolescent psychiatrist, who is supervised by a person meeting all of the requirements described in clause (i).(iii) A person holding, at a minimum, a master’s degree in a field related to mental health or human services, including, but not limited to, marriage and family therapy, clinical social work, professional clinical counseling, infant mental health, human development, human services, psychology, school psychology, child and adolescent psychiatry or occupational therapy, education, social work, and other related fields, as determined by the department, and who has at least two years of experience working with children zero to five years of age, inclusive, who is supervised by a person meeting all of the requirements described in clause (i).(iv) A person meeting all of the requirements described in clause (i) who is providing supervision pursuant to clause (ii) may be an employee of a contracting agency, including on a temporary or part-time basis, or engaged as an external contractor, provided that supervision takes place on a regular basis that is sufficient to offer professional guidance and support.(B) Any person providing mental health consultation services pursuant to this section shall have a successful criminal background check.(3) (A) The early childhood mental health consultation service uses a relationship-based model emphasizing strengthening relationships among early childhood education providers, parents, children, and representatives of community systems and resources, and integrates reflective practice into the onsite consultation model. This model shall include, but not be limited to, The early childhood mental health consultation service model shall incorporate both of the following:(i) The early childhood mental health consultation service be informed by an An early care and education classroom observation tool that includes measures on the classroom environment, social-emotional learning climate, and teacher and child interactions to guide the specific activities and support the consultant shall provide. Selecting a classroom observation tool, choosing an observer, and the timing and cadence of observations may be planned with the classroom team. The classroom observation tool shall be administered at least once per school year in each classroom receiving early childhood mental health consultation service. Classroom assessment tools required by the department may be used to fulfill this requirement.(ii) Recordkeeping that adequately documents all consultation activities.(B) The model described in subparagraph (A) may include, with consent from parents or legal guardians, at least one screening of each enrolled child for adverse childhood experiences.(4) Within the first 30 days upon hire or start of consultation service, a provider agency ensures that a consultant is trained in all of the following:(A) California law and professional ethics for early childhood mental health consultation, including all of the following:(i) Contemporary professional ethics and statutory, regulatory, and decisional laws that delineate the scope of practice of early childhood mental health consultation.(ii) The therapeutic, clinical, and practical considerations involved in the legal and ethical practice of early childhood mental health consultation.(iii) Confidentiality, particularly as it pertains to minors.(B) Child abuse and neglect mandated reporting laws.(C) Best practices and foundations of early childhood mental health consultation.(D) All relevant laws and regulations regarding state and federal childcare programs.(5) Consultants and supervisors shall participate in continuing professional development and education for at least 18 hours per program year. Topics may include, but are not limited to, infant-family and early childhood mental health, implicit bias and equity, trauma-informed practice, early childhood development, and consultation.(c) Notwithstanding the rulemaking provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code) and Section 33308.5, until regulations are filed with the Secretary of State, the department shall, in consultation with the State Department of Social Services, on or before December 31, 2023, issue guidance through management bulletins or similar letters of instruction for programs on implementing the requirements set forth in this section.SEC. 2. Section 10281 of the Welfare and Institutions Code is amended to read:10281. (a) (1) For purposes of this section, “early childhood mental health consultation service” means a service benefiting an infant or toddler who is 0 to 36 months of age, inclusive, and is served in a general childcare and development program pursuant to this chapter, or a child who is 0 to 5 years of age, inclusive, and is served in a family childcare home education network setting funded by a general childcare and development program pursuant to this chapter.(2) For purposes of this section, “early childhood mental health consultation service” includes, but is not limited to, all of the following:(A) Support for providers, parents, legal guardians, and caregivers to create proactive trauma-informed, inclusive environments and to respond effectively to all children.(B) Assistance through individual site consultations, provision of resources, formulation of training plans, referrals, and other methods that address the unique needs of programs and providers.(C) Aid to providers, parents, legal guardians, and caregivers, and encouragement and facilitation of collaboration and communication, in developing the skills and tools needed to be successful as they support the development and early learning of all children, including observing environments, facilitating the development of action plans, and supporting site implementation of those plans.(D) The development of strategies for addressing prevalent child mental health concerns, including internalizing problems, such as appearing withdrawn, and externalizing problems, such as exhibiting persistent and serious behaviors.(E) If a child exhibits persistent and serious behaviors, support with the pursuit and documentation of reasonable steps to maintain the child’s safe participation in the program, as described in Section 10491.1.(F) Face-to-face interactions or video-based platforms and other modes of communication that are compliant with the federal Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act (Public Law 104-191), such as the telephone.(G) Group or individual consultations of any of the actions described in this paragraph.(b) The cost to a provider agency of providing an early childhood mental health consultation service shall be reimbursable pursuant to Section 10281.5 if all of the following apply:(1) The early childhood mental health consultation service is provided on a schedule of sufficient and consistent frequency, continuously throughout the program year, to significantly contribute to all of the following:(A) Improving interpersonal relationships and child outcomes.(B) Increasing the confidence, competence, and well-being of those consulted.(C) Eliminating suspensions and expulsions.(2) (A) The early childhood mental health consultation service is provided by one of the following persons:(i) A licensed mental health professional, including a marriage and family therapist, a licensed clinical social worker, a licensed professional clinical counselor, a licensed psychologist, a licensed child and adolescent psychiatrist, a credentialed school counselor, or a school psychologist credentialed pursuant to Section 44266, and employed pursuant to Section 49400, of the Education Code. The person described in this subparagraph shall have at least three years of experience providing mental health services to children zero to five years of age, inclusive, shall have training in infant, family, and early childhood mental health, shall be adequately insured, shall have held their respective license for a minimum of two years, and shall be in full compliance with all continuing education requirements applicable to their profession.(ii) A license-eligible marriage and family therapist, a license-eligible clinical social worker, a license-eligible professional clinical counselor, a license-eligible psychologist, or a license-eligible child and adolescent psychiatrist, who is supervised by a person meeting all of the requirements described in clause (i).(iii) A person holding, at a minimum, a master’s degree in a field related to mental health or human services, including, but not limited to, marriage and family therapy, clinical social work, professional clinical counseling, infant mental health, human development, human services, psychology, school psychology, child and adolescent psychiatry or occupational therapy, education, social work, and other related fields, as determined by the department, and who has at least two years of experience working with children zero to five years of age, inclusive, who is supervised by a person meeting all of the requirements described in clause (i).(iv) A person meeting all of the requirements described in clause (i) who is providing supervision pursuant to clause (ii) may be an employee of a contracting agency, including on a temporary or part-time basis, or engaged as an external contractor, provided that supervision takes place on a regular basis that is sufficient to offer professional guidance and support.(B) Any person providing mental health consultation services pursuant to this section shall have a successful criminal background check.(3) (A) The early childhood mental health consultation service uses a relationship-based model emphasizing strengthening relationships among early childhood education providers, parents, children, and representatives of community systems and resources, and integrates reflective practice into the onsite consultation model. This model shall include, but not be limited to, The early childhood mental health consultation service model shall incorporate both of the following:(i) The early childhood mental health consultation service be informed by an An early care and education classroom observation tool that includes measures on the classroom environment, social-emotional learning climate, and teacher and child interactions to guide the specific activities and support the consultant shall provide. Selecting a classroom observation tool, choosing an observer, and the timing and cadence of observations may be planned with the classroom team. The classroom observation tool shall be administered at least once per program year in each classroom receiving early childhood mental health consultation service. Classroom assessment tools required by the department may be used to fulfill this requirement.(ii) Recordkeeping that adequately documents all consultation activities.(B) The model described in subparagraph (A) may include, with consent from parents or legal guardians, at least one screening of each enrolled child for adverse childhood experiences.(4) Within the first 30 days upon hire or start of consultation service, a provider agency ensures that a consultant is trained in all of the following:(A) California law and professional ethics for early childhood mental health consultation, including all of the following:(i) Contemporary professional ethics and statutory, regulatory, and decisional laws that delineate the scope of practice of early childhood mental health consultation.(ii) The therapeutic, clinical, and practical considerations involved in the legal and ethical practice of early childhood mental health consultation.(iii) Confidentiality, particularly as it pertains to minors.(B) Child abuse and neglect mandated reporting laws.(C) Best practices and foundations of early childhood mental health consultation.(D) All relevant laws and regulations regarding state and federal childcare programs.(5) Consultants and supervisors shall participate in continuing professional development and education for at least 18 hours per program year. Topics may include, but are not limited to, infant-family and early childhood mental health, implicit bias and equity, trauma-informed practice, early childhood development, and consultation.(c) Notwithstanding the rulemaking provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code), until regulations are filed with the Secretary of State, the State Department of Social Services shall, in consultation with the State Department of Education, on or before December 31, 2023, implement this section through all-county letters or similar instructions until regulations are adopted.